Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-654
Residential district, defined.

Residential district shall mean the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district when the property on such highway for a distance of three hundred feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 150.